pt-BR: Tipo de produto para animais de estimação: Bálsamo; Cápsulas; Creme; Gotas; Seco; Gel; Líquido; Loção; Óleo; Comprimidos; Pó; Mastigações suaves; Spray; Comprimidos; Úmido; Lenços; Outro
nl: Productformulier huisdierbenodigdheden: Balsem; Capsules; Crème; Druppels; Droog; Gel; Vloeistof; Lotion; Olie; Pillen; Poeder; Zachte kauwsnacks; Spray; Tabletten; Nat; Doekjes; Andere
ja: ペット用商品の形態: バーム; カプセル; クリーム; ドロップ; ドライ; ゲル; リキッド; ローション; オイル; ピル; パウダー; ソフトチュー; スプレー; 錠剤; ウェット; ワイプ; その他
cs: Forma produktu chovatelských potřeb: Balzám; Kapsle; Smetana; Kapky; Suché; Gel; Kapalina; Vlasové mléko; Olej; Pilulky; Prášek; Měkké žvýkací pomůcky; Sprej; Tablety; Mokré; Ubrousky; Jiné
ro-RO: Formă produs pentru animale de companie: Balsam; Capsule; Cremă; Picături; Uscată; Gel; Lichid; Loțiune; Ulei; Pastile; Pudră; Jeleuri; Spray; Tablete; Umedă; Șervețele umede; Altele
nb: Form på kjæledyrprodukt: Balsam; Kapsler; Krem; Dråper; Tørr; Gel; Væske; Krem; Olje; Piller; Pulver; Myk tygging; Spray; Tabletter; Våt; Kluter; Annen
pt-PT: Ficha do produto de fornecimento para animais de estimação: Bálsamo; Cápsulas; Creme; Gotas; Seco; Gel; Líquido; Loção; Óleo; Comprimidos; Pó; Mastigação suave; Pulverizador; Tablets; Molhado; Toalhetes; Outro
en: Pet supply product form: Balm; Capsules; Cream; Drops; Dry; Gel; Liquid; Lotion; Oil; Pills; Powder; Soft chews; Spray; Tablets; Wet; Wipes; Other
bg-BG: Форма на продукти за домашни любимци: Балсам; Капсули; Крем; Капки; Сух; Гел; Течност; Лосион; Масло; Хапчета; Пудра; Меки продукти за дъвчене; Спрей; Таблетки; Мокри; Кърпички; Други
sk-SK: Formulár produktov pre domáce zvieratá: Balzam; Kapsuly; Krém; Kvapky; Suchý; Gélový; Kvapalina; Pleťová voda; Olej; Tabletky; Prášok; Mäkké žuvačky; Sprej; Tablety; Mokrý; Utierky; Iné
lt-LT: Gaminio augintiniams pavidalas: Balzamas; Kapsulės; Kremas; Lašai; Sausas; Gelis; Skystis; Losjonas; Aliejus; Tabletės; Milteliai; Minkšti kramtukai; Purškiklis; Tabletės; Šlapias; Servetėlės; Kita
vi: Mẫu sản phẩm cung cấp thú cưng: Dầu thơm; Trà viên; Kem; Giọt; Không ngọt; Gel; Liquid; Dầu dưỡng; Dầu; Thuốc; Bột; Kẹo nhai mềm; Dạng xịt; Viên nén; Ướt; Khăn tay; Khác
zh-TW: 寵物用品商品形式: 軟膏; 膠囊; 鮮奶油; 滴狀; 乾式; 凝膠; 液態; 乳液; 油; 藥丸; 粉末; 軟咀嚼物; 噴霧; 片劑; 濕式; 濕紙巾; 其他
da: Produktform til kæledyrsforsyning: Balsam; Kapsler; Fløde; Dråber; Tør; Gel; Væske; Lotion; Olie; Piller; Pulver; Bløde tygger; Spray; Tabletter; Våd; Servietter; Andet
es: Forma del producto de suministro para mascotas: Bálsamo; Cápsulas; Crema; Gotas; Seco; Gel; Líquido; Loción; Aceite; Pastillas; Polvo; Masticables suaves; Aerosol; Tabletas; Húmedo; Toallitas; Otros
el: Μορφή προϊόντος προμηθειών κατοικιδίων: Βάλσαμο; Κάψουλες; Κρέμα; Σταγόνες; Ξηρό κούρδισμα; Τζελ; Υγρό; Λοσιόν; Έλαιο; Χάπια; Σκόνη; Μαλακά μασώμενα παρασκευάσματα; Σπρέι; Ταμπλέτες; Υγρό κούρδισμα; Μαντηλάκια; Άλλο
zh-CN: 宠物用品产品形态: 香脂; 胶囊; 奶油; 滴; 干; 发胶; 液体; 发露; 润滑油; 药丸; 粉末; 软嚼片; 喷雾; 片剂; 湿润; 湿巾; 其他
pl: Forma produktu dla zwierząt domowych: Balsam; Kapsułki; Krem; Krople; Sucha; Żel; Płyn; Balsam do ciała; Ropa naftowa; Pigułki; Proszek; Miękkie gryzaki; Natrysk; Tabletki; Mokra; Waciki; Pozostałe
sv: Formulär för husdjursprodukter: Balsam; Kapslar; Kräm; Droppar; Torrt; Gel; Vätska; Lotion; Olja; Tabletter; Pulver; Mjuka tuggor; Spray; Tabletter; Våt; Våtservetter; Annat
de: Form des Heimtierbedarfprodukts: Balsam; Kapseln; Creme; Tropfen; Trocken; Gel; Flüssig; Lotion; Öl; Pillen; Puder; Kaubonbons; Spray; Tabletten; Feucht; Reinigungstücher; Sonstiges
ru: Форма продукта для домашних животных: Бальзам; Капсулы; Крем; Капли; Сухой; Гель; Жидкий; Лосьон; Масло; Таблетки; Порошок; Мягкие жевательные конфеты; Спрей; Таблетки; Влажный; Салфетки; Другое
fi: Lemmikkitavaran tuotemuoto: Balsami; Kapselit; Kerma; Pisarat; Kuiva; Geeli; Nestemäinen; Voide; Öljyt; Pillerit; Jauhe; Pehmeät; Suihke; Tabletit; Kostea; Pyyhkeet; Muu
hu: Kisállat ellátására szolgáló termék formája: Balzsam; Kapszula; Krém; Cseppek; Száraz; Gél; Folyadék; Testápoló; Olaj; Pirulák; Por; Puha rágókák; Spray; Tabletták; Nedves; Törlőkendők; Egyéb
it: Formato del prodotto per animali domestici: Balsamo; Capsule; Crema; Gocce; Secco; Gel; Liquido; Lozione; Olio; Pillole; Polvere; Compresse molli; Spray; Pastiglie; Bagnato; Salviettine; Altro
tr: Evcil hayvan tedarik ürünü formu: Balm; Kapsüller; Krema; Damla; Sek; Jel; Sıvı; Losyon; Yağ; Haplar; Pudra; Yumuşak çiğneme; Sprey; Tabletler; Nemli; Mendiller; Diğer
sl-SI: Oblika izdelka za oskrbo hišnih ljubljenčkov: Balzam; Kapsule; Krema; Kapljice; Suha; Gel; Tekočina; Losjon; Olje; Tablete; Prašek; Mehke žvečilke; Razpršilo; Tablete; Mokra; Robčki; Drugo
fr: Forme du produit pour animaux de compagnie: Baume; Capsules; Crème; Gouttes; Sec; Gel; Liquide; Lotion; Huile; Pilules; Poudré; Mastication molle; Vaporisateur; Comprimés; Humide; Lingettes; Autre
th: รูปแบบผลิตภัณฑ์อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง: บาล์ม; แคปซูล; ครีม; หยด; ไม่หวาน; เจล; แบบเหลว; โลชั่น; น้ำมัน; ยาเม็ด; แบบผง; เคี้ยวนุ่ม; สเปรย์; แท็บเล็ต; เปียก; ผ้าเช็ดทำความสะอาด; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Oblik proizvoda za kućne ljubimce: Balzam; Kapsule; Krema; Kapi; Suhi; Gel; Tekućina; Losion; Ulje; Pilule; Prah; Meke tablete; Sprej; Tablete; Mokro; Maramice; Ostalo
ko: 반려동물 용품 형태: 밤; 캡슐; 크림; 드롭; 드라이; 젤; 액상; 로션; 오일; 알약; 가루; 부드럽게 씹힘; 스프레이; 정제; 습식; 물티슈; 기타